Hawaii, session 2025, GM1147.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 200-14, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§200-14 Violation of chapter or rules; penalty. (a) Any
person who violates any provision in this chapter, or rule
adopted by the department, relating to boating accidents,
reckless or unauthorized operation of a vessel, unauthorized
mooring of a vessel, unauthorized commercial activity,
unauthorized camping within state small boat harbors or boating
facilities, animal abandonment within state small boat harbors
or boating facilities, or creation of animal colonies within
state small boat harbors or boating facilities shall be guilty
of a petty misdemeanor and shall be fined not more than $1,000.
(b) Any person who violates any rule adopted by the
department under this part regulating vehicular parking or
traffic movement shall have committed a traffic infraction as
set forth in chapter 291D, the adjudication of which shall be
subject to the provisions contained [t^iorcin. ] in chapter 291D.
2025-2798 SB1318 GDI SMA-l.docx

Page 2 S.B. NO. --
‘ C.D. 1
A person found to have committed a traffic infraction shall be
fined not more than:
(1) $100 for a first violation;
(2) $200 for a second violation; and
(3) $500 for a third or subsequent violation.
-- Notwithstanding the provis-iens of suboGction—(-a-)-?—a«y
poroon who--knowingly or intentionally violatoo any rule adopted
by the department relating to unauthorized discharge,—dumping,
or abandoning^—in—any—statre—boa-t-ing-^deilrity—o¥—strat-e—wat&roT—of-
any—petroleum pmd-ae-tr—hazardoaS' material,—on—sewage an
violation of the state water quality standards—cstabliahed by
the department oi health-,—shall bo fined not mere-tdan-$10,000
for each day of -violation,—and-any vessel,—the—agents-;—ownen;—on
anew—ei—which ■violate the rules of-the depar-tment--shall be fined
net-aftone—than—$0r07-00-6—ten—eaeh—day—er^anstanee—of—vieiatienT—on
sentenced te—a—term ©t—imprisonment etaiet—mene—than thirty
days-;—en—both-; Each day or instance—of each-violation-shall bo
doomed a separate offense.--Additionally,—the agents,—owner,—on
crew of any vessel that vio-iates the-rules of-t^ho department
shall bo-finod net more-than-■ $l.-9,000-for each day- of violation.
2025-2798 SB1318 GDI SMA-l.docx 2

Page 3 S.B. NO.
(c) As a condition of probation pursuant to sections
706-623 and 706-624, or as a condition to the suspension of any
criminal penalties, the environmental court may provide that the
defendant refrain from operating any vessel, including but not
limited to any thrill craft or vessel engaged in parasailing or
water sledding, in specified geographical areas of the waters of
the State.
(d) For the purposes of this section, "operate",
"parasailing", "thrill craft", "vessel", "water sledding", and
"waters of the State" have the same meaning as those terms are
defined in section 200-23."
SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 3. The Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-2798 SB1318 CDl SMA-l.docx 3

1318
S.B. NO
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 14th day of May ,2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAfI

S.B.No. 1318, H.D. 1,C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: April 25, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate


SB No. 1318, HD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 25, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives